New Jersey, session 222, A2153.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  A person experiencing a coin shortage and selling or offering for sale goods or services at retail shall not charge a higher price to a buyer who elects to use cash as payment in order to purchase the goods or services. b.    A violation of this section is an unlawful practice under P.L.1960, c.39 (C.56:8-1 et seq.). c.    As used in this section, at retail shall include any retail transaction conducted in person and exclude any telephone, mail, or Internet-based transaction. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the seventh month next following the date of enactment.